Hawaii, session 2025, SB578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 6E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "historic property" to read as follows: ""Historic property" means any building, structure, object, district, area, or site, including heiau and underwater site, which [is over fifty years old.] predates Statehood Day, August 21, 1959, and, with respect to buildings and structures, is registered on the Hawaii register of historic places." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________